Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
RIGHTS OF LESSEES

§516-61 Applicability. Except as
otherwise expressly provided, this part applies to all leases of residential
lots existing and in force on June 24, 1967, and to all leases of residential
lots executed thereafter.

Notwithstanding any term, condition, or
provision in any lease to the contrary, the lessee of a residential lot shall
have all of the rights enumerated in this part. [L 1967, c 307, §34; HRS
§516-61; am L 1968, c 46, §2j]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next